Massachusetts, session 194th, S738.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Clause (2) of subsection (b) of section 3 of chapter 175H of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting, in line 40, after "94C."
the following words:-
This clause shall not apply to any individual that cannot be medically prescribed the AB
rated generic equivalent and can provide proof from their primary care practitioner.
of 1